Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.550

Violation. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Violation" means a violation of this title that is not a remediable violation, minor violation, or an error classified by the commission as appropriate to address by a technical correction.

[ 2024 c 164 s 255.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.